Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.230

State of emergency—Destroying or damaging property or causing personal injury—Penalty.

After the proclamation of a state of emergency as provided in RCW 43.06.010, any person who maliciously destroys or damages any real or personal property or maliciously injures another is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction thereof shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than two years nor more than ten years.

[ 2003 c 53 s 223; 1992 c 7 s 39; 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.